Washington statutes.
RCW 3.66.130

Court-ordered restitution—Payment.

If the party or entity for whom a court-ordered restitution obligation has been entered pursuant to this title seeks to enforce the judgment as a lien on real estate, he or she shall commence a lien of judgment upon the real estate of the judgment debtor/obligor as provided in RCW 4.56.200.

When any court-ordered restitution obligation entered pursuant to this title is paid or satisfied, the clerk of the court of limited jurisdiction in which the restitution obligation was ordered shall note upon the record of the court of limited jurisdiction satisfaction thereof including the date of the satisfaction.

[ 2001 c 115 s 2.]